Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.260

Rejected initiatives to legislature.

Whenever any measure proposed by initiative petition for submission to the legislature is rejected by the legislature or the legislature takes no action thereon before the end of the regular session at which it is submitted, the secretary of state shall certify the serial number and ballot title thereof to the county auditors for printing on the ballots at the next ensuing general election in like manner as initiative measures for submission to the people are certified.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1826. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.79.270; prior: 1913 c 138 s 21; RRS s 5417. Formerly RCW 29.79.270.]